apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
  <pardef n="l/upu__n_m">
    <e><p><l>upu</l><r>upu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>pup</l><r>upu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċ/angun__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>angun</l><r>angun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nagan</l><r>angun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nagen</l><r>angun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/urdell__n_m">
    <e><p><l>urdell</l><r>urdell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riedel</l><r>urdell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/eċċun__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>eċċun</l><r>eċċun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ċieċen</l><r>eċċun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/oqdief__n_m">
    <e><p><l>oqdief</l><r>oqdief<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>qadef</l><r>oqdief<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/ażbuż__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ażbuż</l><r>ażbuż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>żabaż</l><r>ażbuż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>żiebeż</l><r>ażbuż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ingrava/ta__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ta</l><r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jjet</l><r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/odbod__n_m">
    <e><p><l>odbod</l><r>odbod<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>dabad</l><r>odbod<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="tik/ka__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ek</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="g/allun__n_m">
    <e><p><l>allun</l><r>allun<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lalen</l><r>allun<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ban/k__n_m">
    <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ek</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/armil__n_m">
    <e><p><l>armil</l><r>armil<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ramel</l><r>armil<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="lab/ra__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="lsi/r__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>era</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="xma/ra__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jjar</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ġ/emel__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>emel</l><r>emel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>mula</l><r>emel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>imla</l><r>emel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="/ismar__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ismar</l><r>ismar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>somor</l><r>ismar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="fr/oġa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>oġa</l><r>oġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ejjeġ</l><r>oġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċ/enpula__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>enpula</l><r>enpula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>niepel</l><r>enpula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="f/urketta__n_f">
    <e><p><l>urketta</l><r>urketta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieket</l><r>urketta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/aqdes__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aqdes</l><r>aqdes<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>qades</l><r>aqdes<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/amra__n_f">
    <e><p><l>amra</l><r>amra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>mamar</l><r>amra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/israħ__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>israħ</l><r>israħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sieraħ</l><r>israħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/int__n_f">
    <e><p><l>int</l><r>int<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>niet</l><r>int<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/ejtuni__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ejtuni</l><r>ejtuni<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wieten</l><r>ejtuni<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għ/alqa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>alqa</l><r>alqa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>elieqi</l><r>alqa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="n/ewl__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ewl</l><r>ewl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wiel</l><r>ewl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/eżżula__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>eżżula</l><r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>żieżel</l><r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="bet/but__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>but</l><r>but<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>btie</l><r>but<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/ixkilla__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ixkilla</l><r>ixkilla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>xiekel</l><r>ixkilla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="l/iżar__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>iżar</l><r>iżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ożor</l><r>iżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/urżieqa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>urżieqa</l><r>urżieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieżaq</l><r>urżieqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/arbuna__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>arbuna</l><r>arbuna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>raben</l><r>arbuna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="qol/la__n_f">
    <e><p><l>la</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ol</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/eqer__n_m">
    <e><p><l>eqer</l><r>eqer<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iqra</l><r>eqer<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/urżar__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>urżar</l><r>urżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rażar</l><r>urżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċ/ens__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ens</l><r>ens<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nus</l><r>ens<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="r/iħa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>iħa</l><r>iħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wejjaħ</l><r>iħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/oħħ__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>oħħ</l><r>oħħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ħuħ</l><r>oħħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="z/alza__n_f">
    <e><p><l>alza</l><r>alza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lazi</l><r>alza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="seqer" c="falcon" ><i>s</i><par n="s/eqer__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="liżar" c="sheet" ><i>l</i><par n="l/iżar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għalqa" c="field" ><i>għ</i><par n="għ/alqa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="riħa" c="smell" ><i>r</i><par n="r/iħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bixkilla" c="wicker basket" ><i>b</i><par n="b/ixkilla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bażbuż" c="sickly person" ><i>b</i><par n="b/ażbuż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="takka" c="blot" ><i>tak</i><par n="tik/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="siġra" c="tree" ><i>siġ</i><par n="lab/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="beżżula" c="breast" ><i>b</i><par n="b/eżżula__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bolla" c="stamp" ><i>bol</i><par n="qol/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tikka" c="dot" ><i>tik</i><par n="tik/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lsir" c="slave" ><i>lsi</i><par n="lsi/r__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bodbod" c="he-goat" ><i>b</i><par n="b/odbod__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zalza" c="sauce" ><i>z</i><par n="z/alza__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="klikka" c="clique" ><i>klik</i><par n="tik/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="misraħ" c="open square" ><i>m</i><par n="m/israħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kamra" c="room" ><i>k</i><par n="k/amra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ċens" c="lease" ><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/ens__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="beċċun" c="pigeon" ><i>b</i><par n="b/eċċun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="banka" c="stall" ><i>ban</i><par n="tik/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bxara" c="announcement of an event" ><i>bxa</i><par n="xma/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bint" c="daughter" ><i>b</i><par n="b/int__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="furketta" c="fork" ><i>f</i><par n="f/urketta__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="plakka" c="plaque" ><i>plak</i><par n="tik/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bank" c="bank" ><i>ban</i><par n="ban/k__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="żjara" c="visit" ><i>żja</i><par n="xma/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="molla" c="spring" ><i>mol</i><par n="qol/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="froġa" c="omelette" ><i>fr</i><par n="fr/oġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġamra" c="live coal" ><i>ġam</i><par n="lab/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="burdell" c="brothel" ><i>b</i><par n="b/urdell__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="folla" c="crowd" ><i>fol</i><par n="qol/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="inċirata" c="raincoat" ><i>inċira</i><par n="ingrava/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="antikamra" c="antechamber" ><i>antik</i><par n="k/amra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żurżar" c="tiger moth" ><i>ż</i><par n="ż/urżar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żejtuni" c="person from Żejtun" ><i>ż</i><par n="ż/ejtuni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ballun" c="ball" ><i>b</i><par n="g/allun__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ismar" c="suntanned" ><i></i><par n="/ismar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="newl" c="loom" ><i>n</i><par n="n/ewl__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lupu" c="wolf" ><i>l</i><par n="l/upu__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="manka" c="hose" ><i>man</i><par n="tik/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ingravata" c="tie" ><i>ingrava</i><par n="ingrava/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="barmil" c="bucket" ><i>b</i><par n="b/armil__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ġens" c="ethnic group" ><i>ġ</i><par n="ċ/ens__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maqdes" c="holy place" ><i>m</i><par n="m/aqdes__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċenpula" c="a dowdy woman" ><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/enpula__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="moqdief" c="oar" ><i>m</i><par n="m/oqdief__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="żurżieqa" c="slide" ><i>ż</i><par n="ż/urżieqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċangun" c="large stone slab" ><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/angun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="moħħ" c="mind" ><i>m</i><par n="m/oħħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="trinka" c="trench" ><i>trin</i><par n="tik/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ġemel" c="camel" ><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/emel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="betbut" c="reed-pipe" ><i>bet</i><par n="bet/but__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żarbuna" c="shoe" ><i>ż</i><par n="ż/arbuna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="baqra" c="cow" ><i>baq</i><par n="lab/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qolla" c="type of jar" ><i>qol</i><par n="qol/la__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sikka" c="sandbank" ><i>sik</i><par n="tik/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gallun" c="gallon" ><i>g</i><par n="g/allun__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="għamara" c="furniture" ><i>għama</i><par n="xma/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="stikka" c="cue" ><i>stik</i><par n="tik/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ġarra" c="jar" ><i>ġar</i><par n="lab/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="labra" c="needle" ><i>lab</i><par n="lab/ra__n_f"/></e>
